Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB363.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article II heading of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended to read:ARTICLE IIGENERAL POWERS AND DUTIESOF THE DEPARTMENT OF [PUBLIC WELFARE] HUMAN SERVICESSection 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 217. Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program.--(a) No later than July 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, shall establish the Low-Income Household Water Assistance 12345678910111213141516171819 Program, to be administered by the department.(b) The purpose of the program is to provide assistance for individuals who are eligible for assistance in accordance with subsection (c), for any of the purposes specified under subsection (f) upon the termination of the temporary Federal Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program.(c) (1) The department shall develop eligibility requirements under the program in accordance with this subsection, without limitation.(2) An individual is eligible for assistance under the program if the individual:(i) Owns or rents a home in this Commonwealth.(ii) Is a water system customer or wastewater system customer, or both, and is financially responsible for paying the water system bills or wastewater system bills, or both.(iii) Has an overdue water system bill or wastewater system bill, which has resulted in arrearages, a termination notice or the termination of water system services or wastewater system services, or both.(iv) Meets certain income guidelines as determined by the department.(d) (1) A water system entity or wastewater system entity may apply for a grant under the program on behalf of individuals who are eligible for assistance under subsection (c) and who are customers of the entity.(2) The application under this subsection must be on a form and in a manner determined by the department.(3) A completed application under this subsection must contain:(i) The name and contact information of the water system 20250SB0363PN0313 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity or wastewater system entity.(ii) The following information regarding the customers in need of assistance under the program:(A) The names and addresses of the customers.(B) Proof that the customers are individuals who are eligible for assistance in accordance with subsection (c).(C) The amount of the overdue water system bills or wastewater system bills for the customers, along with the circumstances that have resulted from the overdue bills, including arrearages, termination notices or termination of services.(e) The department shall review each application under subsection (d) and determine the total amount of the grant to be awarded. The award must include the names of the customers designated to receive grant money, the amount of grant money that each designated customer shall receive and any conditions regarding the grant or grant money.(f) A grant under the program may only be used to:(1) Prevent the termination of water system services or wastewater system services, or both.(2) Pay overdue water system bills or wastewater system bills, or both.(3) Restore terminated water system services or wastewater system services, or both.(g) The following apply to reports:(1) Each July 1 following the effective date of this subsection, the department shall issue a report on the following information for the previous fiscal year:(i) The water system entities and wastewater system entities that applied for a grant under the program.20250SB0363PN0313 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The water system entities and wastewater system entities that received a grant under the program.(iii) The number of customers who received assistance under the program, along with the amount and purpose of the grant money received by each customer.(iv) The total amount of money expended under the program.(2) The department shall submit each report under this subsection to the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(iii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iv) The Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate.(v) The Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(vii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) Each report under this subsection shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(h) Rulemaking authority.--The department shall promulgate rules, regulations or guidelines necessary to implement this section.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Program" means the Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program established under subsection (a).20250SB0363PN0313 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Wastewater system" means as the term "sewer system" is defined under 25 Pa. Code § 94.1 (relating to definitions)."Water system" means a public water system that serves at least fifteen service connections used by year-round residents or regularly serves at least twenty-five year-round residents.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0363PN0313 - 5 - 123456